Hawaii statutes.
§302A-808 Penalty. Any person who
engages in the profession of teaching in a public school without first being
issued a license or hired on an emergency basis as defined in this chapter
shall be fined not more than $500. Any person who knowingly or intentionally
violates this subpart by employing an individual as a public school teacher who
does not possess a valid license or is not a department of education or charter
school emergency hire as defined in this chapter may be fined not more than
$500. All fines shall be deposited into the Hawaii teacher standards board
special fund. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 312, pt of §10; am L 2003,
c 3, §13; am L 2014, c 39, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next